Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

22-1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, the term:

“Blighted property,” “blighted,” or “blight” means any urbanized or developed property which:

Presents two or more of the following conditions:

Uninhabitable, unsafe, or abandoned structures;

Inadequate provisions for ventilation, light, air, or sanitation;

An imminent harm to life or other property caused by fire, flood, hurricane, tornado, earthquake, storm, or other natural catastrophe respecting which the Governor has declared a state of emergency under state law or has certified the need for disaster assistance under federal law; provided, however, that this division shall not apply to property unless the relevant public agency has given notice in writing to the property owner regarding specific harm caused by the property and the owner has failed to take reasonable measures to remedy the harm;

A site identified by the federal Environmental Protection Agency as a Superfund site pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 9601, et seq., or environmental contamination to an extent that requires remedial investigation or a feasability study;

Repeated illegal activity on the individual property of which the property owner knew or should have known; or

The maintenance of the property is below state, county, or municipal codes for at least one year after notice of the code violation; and

Is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, or crime in the immediate proximity of the property.

Property shall not be deemed blighted because of esthetic conditions.

“Common carrier” means any carrier required by law to convey passengers or freight without refusal if the approved fare or charge is paid.

“Condemnor” or “condemning authority” means:

The State of Georgia or any branch or any department, board, commission, agency, or authority of the executive branch of the government of the State of Georgia;

Any county or municipality of the State of Georgia;

Any housing authority with approval of the governing authority of the city or county as provided in Code Section 8-3-31.1;

Any other political subdivision of the State of Georgia which possesses the power of eminent domain; and

All public utilities that possess the right or power of eminent domain.

“Economic development” means any economic activity to increase tax revenue, tax base, or employment or improve general economic health, when the activity does not result in:

Transfer of land to public ownership;

Transfer of property to a private entity that is a public utility;

Lease of property to private entities that occupy an incidental area within a public project; or

The remedy of blight.

“Each person with a legal claim” means the owner of the property or of any remainder, reversion, mortgage, lease, security deed, or other claim in the property.

“Interest” means any title or nontitle interest other than fee simple title.

“Persons” means individuals, partnerships, associations, and corporations, domestic or foreign.

“Property” means fee simple title.

“Public use” means:

The possession, occupation, or use of the land by the general public or by state or local governmental entities;

The use of land for the creation or functioning of public utilities;

The opening of roads, the construction of defenses, or the providing of channels of trade or travel;

The acquisition of property where title is clouded due to the inability to identify or locate all owners of the property;

The acquisition of property where unanimous consent is received from each person with a legal claim that has been identified and found; or

The remedy of blight.

The public benefit of economic development shall not constitute a public use.

“Public utility” means any publicly, privately, or cooperatively owned line, facility, or system for producing, transmitting, or distributing communications, power, electricity, light, heat, gas, oil products, water, steam, clay, waste, storm water not connected with highway drainage, and other similar services and commodities, including publicly owned fire and police and traffic signals and street lighting systems, which directly or indirectly serve the public. This term also means a person, municipal corporation, county, state agency, or public authority which owns or manages a utility as defined in this paragraph. This term shall also include common carriers and railroads.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 219, § 3; Code 1933, § 36-201; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 3/HB 1313; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 22/HB 323.

Cross references.

Fee simple estates generally, §

44-6-20

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to those condemnation proceedings filed on or after February 9, 2006, where title has not vested in the condemning authority unless constitutionally prohibited.

Law reviews.

For comment on Botts v. Southeastern Pipeline Co.,

190 Ga. 689

,

10 S.E.2d 375

(1940); Harrell v. Southeastern Pipeline Co.,

190 Ga. 709

,

10 S.E.2d 387

(1940), see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 49 (1941).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

For note, “The Georgia Condominium Act’s Authorization of Private Takings:
Revisiting

Kelo

and ‘Bitter with the Sweet,”’ see 55 Ga. L. Rev. 395 (2020).

22-1-2.
Nature of right of eminent domain; property to be put to public use.

The right of eminent domain is the right of this state, through its regular organization, to reassert, either temporarily or permanently, its dominion over any portion of the soil of this state on account of public exigency and for the public good. Thus, in time of war or insurrection the proper authorities may possess and hold any part of the territory of this state for the common safety. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, except as provided in Code Section 22-1-15, neither this state nor any political subdivision thereof nor any other condemning authority shall use eminent domain unless it is for public use. Public use is a matter of law to be determined by the court and the condemnor bears the burden of proof.

Except as provided in Code Section 22-1-15, no condemnation shall be converted to any use other than a public use for 20 years from the initial condemnation.

Except as provided in Code Section 22-1-15, if property acquired through the power of eminent domain from an owner fails to be put to a public use within five years, the former property owner may apply to the condemnor or its successor or assign for reconveyance or quitclaim of the property to the former property owner or for additional compensation for such property. For purposes of this subsection, property shall be considered to have been put to a public use at the point in time when substantial good faith effort has been expended on a project to put the property to public use, notwithstanding the fact that the project may not have been completed. The application shall be in writing, and the condemnor or its successor or assign shall act on the application within 60 days by:

Executing a reconveyance or quitclaim of the property upon receipt of compensation not to exceed the amount of the compensation paid by the condemnor at the time of acquisition; or

Paying additional compensation to the former owner of the property, such compensation to be calculated by subtracting the price paid by the condemnor for the property at the time of acquisition from the fair market value of the property at the time the application is filed.

If the condemnor fails to take either action within 60 days, the former property owner may, within the next 90 days following, initiate an action in the superior court in the county in which the property is located to reacquire the property or receive additional compensation.

The condemnor shall provide notice to each former owner of the property prior to acquisition if the condemnor fails to put such property to a public use within five years. The condemnee shall have one year from the date notice is received to bring an application under this subsection.

When property is acquired from more than one owner for the same public use and reconveyance or additional compensation to a single owner is impracticable, any party to the original condemnation or each person with a legal claim in such condemnation may file an action in the superior court in the county in which the property is located for an equitable resolution.

This Code section shall not apply to condemnations subject to Code Section 22-3-162 or Title 32.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2201; Code 1868, § 2196; Code 1873, § 2222; Code 1882, § 2222; Civil Code 1895, § 3052; Civil Code 1910, § 3624; Code 1933, § 36-101; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 4/HB 1313; Ga. L. 2017, p. 754, § 1/HB 434.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For comment on Botts v. Southeastern Pipeline Co.,

190 Ga. 689

,

10 S.E.2d 375

(1940); Harrell v. Southeastern Pipeline Co.,

190 Ga. 709

,

10 S.E.2d 387

(1940), see 3 Ga. B.J. 49 (1941); State Hwy. Dep’t v. Lumpkin,

222 Ga. 727

,

152 S.E.2d 557

(1966), see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 483 (1967).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

For annual survey on real property law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2009).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 201 (2017).

22-1-3.
Power of General Assembly to determine when right of eminent domain may be exercised; duty of courts as to laws authorizing the condemnation of private property for private uses.

It is the province of the General Assembly to determine when the right of eminent domain may be exercised. If, however, under pretext of such necessity the General Assembly should pass a law authorizing the taking of property for private use rather than for public use, the courts should declare the law inoperative.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2202; Code 1868, § 2197; Code 1873, § 2223; Code 1882, § 2223; Civil Code 1895, § 3053; Civil Code 1910, § 3625; Code 1933, § 36-102.

22-1-4.
Manner in which General Assembly may exercise right of eminent domain.

The General Assembly may exercise the right of eminent domain directly through the officers of the state, through the medium of corporate bodies, or by means of individual enterprise.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2203; Code 1868, § 2198; Code 1873, § 2224; Code 1882, § 2224; Civil Code 1895, § 3054; Civil Code 1910, § 3626; Code 1933, § 36-103.

Law reviews.

For note, “Regulation and Ownership of the Marshlands: The Georgia Marshlands Act,” see 5 Ga. St. L. Rev. 563 (1971).

22-1-5.
Requirement of just compensation as a limitation on exercise of power of eminent domain.

Except in cases of extreme necessity and great urgency, the right of eminent domain cannot be exercised without first providing for just compensation to the owner for the interference with his exclusive rights.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2204; Code 1868, § 2199; Code 1873, § 2225; Code 1882, § 2225; Civil Code 1895, § 3055; Civil Code 1910, § 3627; Code 1933, § 36-104.

Cross references.

Private ways, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. III, Para. II. Specific powers of General Assembly, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. II.

Law reviews.

For comment on DeKalb County v. Trustees, Decatur Lodge No. 1602,

242 Ga. 707

,

251 S.E.2d 243

(1978), see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 367 (1979).

22-1-6.
Right of persons to take or damage private property upon payment of just and adequate compensation.

If a person who is authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain cannot by contract procure the property or the easement, right of way, waterway, franchise, or other interest sought to be condemned, the person may take or damage the property or interest upon paying or tendering to the owner thereof just and adequate compensation.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 4658; Civil Code 1910, § 5207; Code 1933, § 36-302.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of real property law, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 231 (2016).

22-1-7.
Effect of failure to agree on compensation.

If the parties cannot agree upon the compensation to be paid, the same shall be assessed and determined as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 2 of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 4659; Civil Code 1910, § 5208; Code 1933, § 36-303.

22-1-8.
Exclusive nature of title.

All persons authorized to take or damage private property for public purposes shall proceed as set forth in this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 4657; Civil Code 1910, § 5206; Code 1933, § 36-301.

22-1-9.
Policies and practices guiding exercise of eminent domain.

In order to encourage and expedite the acquisition of real property by agreements with owners, to avoid litigation and relieve congestion in the courts, to assure consistent treatment for property owners, and to promote public confidence in land acquisition practices, all condemnations and potential condemnations shall, to the greatest extent practicable, be guided by the following policies and practices:

The condemning authority shall make every reasonable effort to acquire expeditiously real property by negotiation;

Where the condemning authority seeks to obtain a fee simple interest in real property, real property shall be appraised before the initiation of negotiations, and the owner or his or her designated representatives shall be given an opportunity to accompany the appraiser during his or her inspection of the property, except that the condemning authority may, by law, rule, regulation, or ordinance, prescribe a procedure to waive the appraisal in cases involving the acquisition by sale or donation of property with a low fair market value;

Before the initiation of negotiations for fee simple interest for real property, the condemning authority shall establish an amount which it believes to be just compensation and shall make a prompt offer to acquire the property for the full amount so established. In no event shall such amount be less than the condemning authority’s independent appraisal of the fair market value of such property. The condemning authority shall provide the owner of real property to be acquired with a written statement of, and summary of the basis for, the amount it established as just compensation. Where appropriate, the just compensation for the real property acquired and for damages to remaining real property shall be separately stated. The condemning authority shall consider alternative sites suggested by the owner of the property as part of the compensation offered;

No owner shall be required to surrender possession of real property before the condemning authority pays the agreed purchase price or deposits with the court in accordance with this title, for the benefit of the owner, an amount not less than the condemning authority’s appraisal of the fair market value of such property or the amount of the award of compensation in the condemnation proceeding for such property;

The construction or development of a project for public use shall be so scheduled that, to the greatest extent practicable, no person lawfully occupying real property shall be required to move from a dwelling or to move his or her business or farm operation without at least 90 days’ written notice from the condemning authority of the date by which such move is required;

If the condemning authority permits an owner or tenant to occupy the real property acquired on a rental basis for a short term or for a period subject to termination by the condemning authority on short notice, the amount of rent required shall not exceed the fair rental value of the property to a short-term occupier;

In no event shall the condemnor act in bad faith in order to compel an agreement on the price to be paid for the property;

If any legal interest in real property is to be acquired by exercise of the power of eminent domain, the condemning authority shall institute formal condemnation proceedings. No condemnor shall intentionally make it necessary for an owner to institute legal proceedings to prove the fact of the taking of his or her real property; and

A person whose real property is being acquired in accordance with this title may, after the person has been fully informed of his or her right to receive just compensation for such property, donate such property, any part thereof, any legal interest therein, or any compensation paid to a condemning authority, as such person shall determine.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-1-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 5/HB 1313; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 22/HB 79; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 22/SB 365.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “property as part of the compensation offered” for “property as of the compensation offered” at the end of the last sentence in paragraph (3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For annual survey on real property, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 251 (2017).

For annual survey on real property law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 209 (2018).

22-1-10.
Duties of condemnor prior to exercise of eminent domain; rights of condemnee; exceptions.

Prior to exercising the power of eminent domain, a governmental condemnor shall:

Not less than 15 days before any meeting at which a resolution approving the exercise of eminent domain is to be considered, post a sign, if possible, in the right of way adjacent to each property that is subject to the proposed use of the eminent domain power stating the time, date, and place of such meeting;

Attempt to serve the condemnee personally with notice of the meeting not less than 15 days before any meeting at which such resolution is to be considered, unless service is acknowledged or waived by the condemnee. If the attempted service is unsuccessful, service of notice may be satisfied by mail or statutory overnight delivery to the property owner at the address of record and, if different from the property owner, to the parties in possession of the property, return receipt requested;

Ensure that any notice that is required by law to be published be placed in the county legal organ, but such notice shall not be published in the legal notices section of such newspaper; and

Ensure that any meeting at which such resolution is to be considered and voted on shall commence after 6:00 P.M.

Any such resolution shall specifically and conspicuously delineate each parcel to be affected.

A nongovernmental condemnor shall, with respect to its exercise of the power of eminent domain in general, by action of the governing body or chief executive officer of the condemnor designate who is authorized to approve the exercise of the power of eminent domain by the condemnor and provide a method for documenting the time of the exercise of final approval of a particular exercise of the power of eminent domain by that individual or group of individuals. Such a condemning authority shall with respect to any particular exercise of the power of eminent domain:

Not less than 15 days before the documented time of approval of the exercise of eminent domain, post a sign, if possible, in the right of way adjacent to each property that is subject to the proposed use of the eminent domain power stating: (A) that the property is subject to a proposed condemnation which may be initiated after 15 days from the date of posting; (B) the date of posting; and (C) the name, business address, and telephone number of the condemnor;

Not less than 15 days before the documented time of approval of the exercise of eminent domain serve the condemnee personally with notice of the proposed condemnation stating: (A) that the property is subject to a proposed condemnation which may be initiated after 15 days from the date of service; (B) the date of service; and (C) the name, business address, and telephone number of the condemnor. If the attempted service is unsuccessful, service of notice may be satisfied by mail or statutory overnight delivery to the property owner at the address of record and, if different from the property owner, to the parties in possession of the property, return receipt requested; and

Provide the condemnee with an opportunity to meet with the individual or group of individuals having the power of documented approval or a representative of such individual or individuals.

The condemnee may in writing waive any rights of the condemnee under this Code section.

Any notice required to be personally served or mailed under this Code section shall be accompanied by a written statement of the rights that the condemnee possesses including but not limited to the right to notice, damages, hearing, and appeal of any award entered by the special master as described in this title. The written statement of rights shall also include the right to bring a motion pursuant to Code Section 22-1-11 as well as a sample motion. The Department of Community Affairs shall promulgate written notice of rights forms that shall be used for purposes of this subsection. The Department of Community Affairs shall promulgate different notice forms for each of the types of condemnation proceedings authorized by law. This subsection shall not become effective until the Department of Community Affairs has promulgated the written notice of rights forms contemplated under this subsection and such forms shall be promulgated no later than January 1, 2007.

This Code section shall not apply to condemnations for the purposes of constructing or expanding one or more electric transmission lines, to condemnations pursuant to Code Section 46-8-121, or to any condemnations under Title 32.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-1-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 5/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

22-1-10.1.
Time for bringing condemnation action; exceptions.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, no action for condemnation may be brought in any court of this state until at least 30 days after the date of the resolution or documented approval described in Code Section 22-1-10.

If an emergency condition exists requiring the acquisition of property for the protection of the public health and safety, the condemnor may declare the existence of an emergency and adopt a resolution defining the emergency. Notice and hearing as required by Code Section 22-1-10 may be waived by the condemning body in an emergency condition.

This Code section shall not apply to the acquisition or condemnation of property where consent is received from each person with a legal claim that has been identified or found.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-1-10.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 5/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

22-1-11.
Determination of authority to exercise public domain.

Before the vesting of title in the condemnor and upon motion of the condemnee, or within ten days of the entry of the special master’s award by entry of exception to the case, the court shall determine whether the exercise of the power of eminent domain is for a public use and whether the condemning authority has the legal authority to exercise the power of eminent domain and may stay other proceedings of the condemnation pending the decision of the court. The condemning authority shall bear the burden of proof by the evidence presented that the condemnation is for a public use as defined in Code Section 22-1-1. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require the condemnee to seek or obtain a special master’s award prior to a hearing or decision by the court under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-1-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 5/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to those condemnation proceedings filed on or after February 9, 2006, where title has not vested in the condemning authority unless constitutionally prohibited.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

22-1-12.
Reimbursement to property owner of reasonable costs and expenses associated with condemnation proceedings.

In all actions where a condemning authority exercises the power of eminent domain, the court having jurisdiction of a proceeding instituted by a condemnor to acquire real property by condemnation shall award the owner of any right or title to or interest in such real property such sum as will in the opinion of the court reimburse such owner for his or her reasonable costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney, appraisal, and engineering fees, actually incurred because of the condemnation proceedings, if:

The final judgment is that the condemning authority cannot acquire the real property by condemnation; or

The proceeding is abandoned by the condemning authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-1-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 5/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to those condemnation proceedings filed on or after February 9, 2006, where title has not vested in the condemning authority unless constitutionally prohibited.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For annual survey on real property law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2009).

For survey article on real property law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 193 (2015).

For annual survey of real property law, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 231 (2016).

22-1-13.
Compensation to condemnee for relocation damages and expenses.

In addition to the types of relocation damages permissible under law, any condemnee that is displaced as a result of the condemnation shall be entitled to:

Actual reasonable expenses in moving himself or herself, his or her family, business, farm operation, or other personal property within a reasonable distance from the property condemned;

Actual direct losses of tangible personal property as a result of moving or discontinuing a business or farm operation;

Such other relocation expenses as authorized by law; and

With the consent of the condemnee, the condemnor may provide alternative site property as full or partial compensation.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-1-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 5/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to those condemnation proceedings filed on or after February 9, 2006, where title has not vested in the condemning authority unless constitutionally prohibited.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

22-1-14.
Valuation of condemned property.

When property is condemned under this title or any other title of this Code, the value of the condemned property may be determined through lay or expert testimony and its admissibility shall be addressed to the sound discretion of the court.

If any party to a condemnation proceeding seeks to introduce expert testimony as to the issue of just and adequate compensation, Code Section 24-7-702 shall not apply.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-1-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 5/HB 1313; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 38/HB 24.

Cross references.

Expert opinion testimony in civil actions, §

24-7-702

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to those condemnation proceedings filed on or after February 9, 2006, where title has not vested in the condemning authority unless constitutionally prohibited.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For annual survey of evidence law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

22-1-15.
Process for condemnor to condemn property for public use; requirements; service.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Condemnor” means a county, municipality, or consolidated government of this state.

“Economic development” means any economic activity to increase tax revenue, tax base, or employment or improve general economic health, when the activity does not result in:

Transfer of land to public ownership;

Transfer of property to a private entity that is a public utility; or

Lease of property to private entities that occupy an incidental area within a public project.

“Public use” means the remedy of blight when economic development is a secondary or ancillary public benefit of condemnation.

A condemnor seeking to condemn property for public use under this Code section shall first petition the superior court of the county having jurisdiction for a judgment in rem against such property seeking a determination as to whether the property complained of in the petition is blighted property.

The petition described in subsection (b) of this Code section shall set forth:

The facts showing the right to condemn;

The property or interest to be taken;

The names and residences of the persons whose property or interests are to be taken or otherwise affected, so far as known;

A description of any unknown persons or classes of unknown persons whose rights in the property or interest are to be affected;

A description of the appearance of the property and any structures thereon;

Such other facts as are necessary for a full understanding of the cause;

A statement setting forth the need of the court to review the evidence and determine whether such property meets the definition of blight;

A prayer for an order to be issued by the court as may be proper and desired; and

Whether any of the persons referred to in this subsection are minors or disabled.

Upon presentation of the petition set forth in subsection (c) of this Code section, the court shall issue an order requiring all parties of interest to appear at a time and place named in the order and make known their objections if any as to the question of whether the property shall be deemed blighted.

The date of the hearing shall be no less than 30 days from the date such petition is filed.

The order described in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall give directions for providing notice of the hearing and the service of such notices.

It shall not be necessary to attach any other process to the petition except the order referred to in paragraph (1) of this subsection, and the cause shall proceed as in rem.

All persons entitled to notice under the facts stated in the petition shall be personally served with a copy of the petition and order issued pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section as in other causes at law, unless such service is waived in writing. All other service shall be made by the method as provided in Part 2 of Article 1 of Chapter 2 of this title, and all persons so served shall be deemed parties to the cause.

In any cases where it seems to the court to be in the interest of justice and of more effective notice to cause additional notice or service to be given, it shall be within the court’s discretion to so order. In such cases, such additional notice and service shall be made as ordered before the cause proceeds to final hearing. In cases where any taxes are alleged to be due or unpaid, the order shall direct that a separate notice to that effect be given the proper tax collector or tax commissioner.

On the day named in the order made pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section, or at any other time to which the hearing may be continued, the court, having first passed on and adjudged all questions touching service and notice, shall, after hearing from all persons responding and desiring to be heard, make such order as is appropriate based on the evidence as to whether or not the property shall be deemed blighted.

Any property deemed blighted shall be described in the order adjudging such determination and contain a statement of the then current approved land use of the property, or in the case of vacant property, the last lawful use for which the property was occupied, and such property’s future use shall be restricted to the same land use as stated in the order for a period of five years from the date of the order.

A condemnor which has obtained an order under subsection (h) of this Code section declaring a property to be blighted shall within 60 days from such order, or in the event of an appeal, 60 days from the date when the remittitur of the appellate court is made the judgment of the court, file an action to condemn the property pursuant to the procedures set forth in Article 3 of Chapter 2 of this title. When a condemnor proceeds as set forth in Article 3 of Chapter 2 of this title, it shall attach a copy of the order issued under subsection (h) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-1-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 754, § 2/HB 434.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 enactment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 201 (2017).

For annual survey on real property, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 251 (2017).